src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
"Alveolar assimilation for consonant stem s in infinitives"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
!%^N:t <=> s %> _ [%^A:|%^U: [.#.|%>]|| e [s s|n]] ; ! noustessa, nousten, kusta, pestä, kustu, pesty
%^N:t <=> s %> _ [%^A:| e [s s|n]] ; ! noustessa, nousten, kusta, pestä, nousta
!! **Tests:**

!!€ häris>^N^A
!!€ häris>tä
!€ h ä r i s > ^N:t ^A:ä

"Alveolar assimilation for consonant stem s in participles"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
%^N:s <=> s %> _ %^U: (t) ; ! kussut, pessyt
 !         s %> _ e ;      ! kusseet (?)

	  


!! ## Vowel change rules: a - ä - e - i - o - ö - u - y

!! Here come the rules for stem vowel changes in front of suffix *-i-*
!! (be it plural, present, comparative or conditional).
!! Vowels are deleted or changed according to context.
!! There are also some other vowel change rules.

!! ###  a rules

"a:e"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** before the ^AE trigger
a:e <=> _ %^AE: ;

"a:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** before metathesis h
a:0 <=>                                                          _ [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> ;        ! 
    [.#.|#] Cns:* RndVow (Vow) Cns:+ (:Cns) (Vow:)               _ (%^WG:) (%^IDEL:)  %> [i2:|i3:|j|i8:] ;   
                                                a                _    %> [i2:|i3:|i4:|i5:] ; !shortening before i; saa:sai
 [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow:+ Cns:+ Vow:+ Cns:+ (:Cns) (i)                _ (%^WG:)  %> [i3: |i8:] ;   
         Cns:* Vow:+ Cns:+ VowNotI:+ NonLNR (i)                  _ (%^WG:)  %> i2: ; !3-syll nouns: NOT with last vow=i, not with lnr
 [.#.|#] (Cns+ Vow+) Cns:* Vow:+ Cns:+ [Vow:+ Cns:+|Cns VowNotI] _ ([%^WG:|%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:])  %> (h) i: ; !3-syll 
 [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow:+ Cns:+ Vow:+ Cns:+ (:h)                      _ ([%^WG:|%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:]) %> (h:) (Vow) i9: ; !adjectives with plural-i; kamalissa 
 [.#.|#] Cns:* RndVow (Vow) Cns:+                                _ (%^WG:)  %> i3: ;   ! huutaa>huusin
                                                                 _  (%^WG:) (i m e:) %> i5: ; !kova>kovimpiin ; adj superlativ

!! **Tests:**
!!€ kuva>i2ss^A
!!€ kuv0>issa
!€ k u v a:0 > i2:i s s ^A:a
!!€ kuv0a^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ kuvv00>haan
!€ k u v 0:v a:0 ^HMETA:0 > h ^V:a  ^V:a n
!!€ saa>i3t
!!€ sa0>it
!€ s a a:0 > i3:i t

"a:o when nonrounded root vowel and before i"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
a:o <=> [.#.|#] Cns:* UnRndVow:+ ([u|i|e|a]) Cns:+ (:Cns) (i) _ (%^WG:|%^A2O:) (%^IDEL:) %> [i2:|i3:|i8:|j] ; !saunoissa, vanhoitten
        [.#.|#] Cns:* UnRndVow:+ ([o|u])     Cns:+ (:Cns) (i) _ (%^WG:|%^A2O:) %> [i2:|i3:|i8:|j] ; ! see fkv
        [.#.|#] Cns:*   Vow:+       Cns:+  i Cns:+ (:Cns) (i) _ (%^WG:|%^A2O:) %> [i2:|j]; !lukijoissa, apinoissa; 3-syll with last vow=i  
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow:+ Cns:+ Vow    [l|n|r|Cns Cns:]     _ (%^WG:|%^A2O:) %> i2: ; !3-syll with lnr
        (Cns:+)   Vow:+ Cns:+ (Cns:) Vow:+  (Cns:) Cns: Cns: _ (%^WG:|%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:|%^A2O:) %> [i2:] ; !almunakoissa; ammunoissa (flerst.) a>o eft. 2xCns
        (Cns:+) Vow:+ Cns:+ (Cns:) Vow:+ [l|n|r]              _ (%^WG:|%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:|%^A2O:) %> [i2:] ; !tavara (flerstaviga) a>o efter lnr
        [.#.|#] Vow:+  Cns:+ (Cns:) (Vow:) i:    Cns:+ (Cns:) _ (%^WG:|%^A2O:) %> [i2:|j]; !; (flerstaviga) a>o efter i !NY alkeija
        ![.#.|#] Cns:* UnRndVow:+ ([o|u])     Cns:+ (:Cns) (i) _ (%^WG:) %> [i2:|i3:|i8:|j] ; ! see fkv

!! **Tests:**
!!€ laatia>i2tten
!!€ laatio>itten
!€ l a l t i a:o > i2:i t t e n
!!€ fankila>i2ss^A
!!€ fankilo>issa
!€ f a n k i l a:o > i2:i s s ^A:a

!! ###  ä rules

"ä:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
ä:0 <=>   Cns:* Vow:+ Cns:+ _ (WeakGrade) (%^IDEL:) %> [i2:|i3:|i8:|j] ; ! before i
                            _ [%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:]            ; ! before metathesis h
        ä                   _                       %> [i2:|i3:|i5:|i8:]     ; ! jäädä : jäi
                            _                       %> i5: ; !selvä>selvimpiin ; adj superlativ

!! **Tests:**
!!€ sytyttä^WG>i3n
!!€ sytyt000>in
!!€ päivä>i2ss^A
!!€ päiv0>issä
!!€ pitä>i3
!!€ pit0>i
!!€ jää>i3n
!!€ jä0>in

"ä:e"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
ä:e <=> _ %^AE: %^WG: %> t  ; 
        _ %^AE: %> ; !adj comparative 


!! ###  e rules

"e:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** deletes *-e-* in LNR stems as well as before -i-
e:0 <=>                                                   _ (WeakGrade) h %> e ; ! säkheen del before h in e stems
                                                          _ [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] ;
                         [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+ [h|l|n|r|t] _ %> t [%^A:|%^U:]; ! tulta, tultu
                           [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+ [l|n|r] t _ %> t [%^A:|%^U:]; ! tulta, tultu
                              [.#.|#] Cns:* [Vow Vow|u] l _ %> t e n ; ! kielten, puolten
                              [.#.|#] Cns:* [Vow Vow|e] r _ %> t e n ; ! merten, puolten
[.#.|#|%-] Cns:* [i [e|i]|u ([u|o])|y y|ä ä|e (e)|a i] :n _ %> t e n ; !unten, lunten, sienten, lienten
                                                     Cns: _ (e) (WeakGrade) %> [i2:|i3:|i4:|i5:|i8:] ; !Shortening before i
                                                t i _ t:0 o ; ! to get tieto > tiot etc (CHECK: expand?)
!     k: s _ [.#.|#|t] ; ! look at this

!! **Tests:**

!!€ tule^WG>i2ss^A
!!€ tul00>issa
!€ t u l e:0 ^WG:0 > i2:i s s ^A:a

"e:i"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
e:i <=> Cns:* Vow:* Cns:* _ (%^WG:) (%>) %^E2I: ; !18 nov


!! **Tests:**

!!€ ove^E2I
!!€ ovi0
!€ o v e:i ^E2I:0

"ä:ö"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
ä:ö <=> Cns:+ Vow:+ Cns:+ Vow: Cns:+ _ (Dummy:) %^A2O:0 ; !TBC to get päärynä>päärynöitä 19 nov


!! **Tests:**


!! ###  i rules

"i:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
i:0 <=>  
!Vow (:Cns) Cns _ [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] ;               ! before metathesis h
                  Cns   _ [e|i] (%^WG:0) %> [i2:|i3:|i4:|i5:] ; ! tie, pii, viedä
          Cns [a|o|ö|ä] _       %> [i2:|i3:|i4:] ; ! hai, koi, naida, puida, vasikoida, käpelöidä
                        _ [%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:] ;               ! keppi : kepphiin
	               Cns: _ (WeakGrade) %>  [i3:|i8:] ; ! sopia : sopi, oppia : oppi removed i2
      [#|.#.] (Cns) Vow _ %> i3: ; ! uija>uin
                  Cns: _ (%^WG:) %^IDEL: %> [i2:|e:] ; ! tukki : tukkitten 
                   ! tarkista: xxx "i to e in plural" i:e <=> Cns: _ ([Dummy: - %^HMETA:]) %> i2: ;
                   ![(^%HMETA: h: |%^HMET2: h:)] 

!! **Tests:**

!!€ sii0li^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ siihl00>0iin
!!€ hai>i2t
!!€ ha0>it
!!€ vasikoi>i3n
!!€ vasiko0>in
!!€ vie>i3n
!!€ v0e>in
!!€ oppi>i3
!!€ opp0>i

"i:j"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
i:j <=> [o|ö] _ k:0 :Vow ; ! pojan
        [o|ö] _ k:0 Vow:0 %^WG: %> :i ; ! pojissa
       [.#.|#] a _ k:0 a %^WG: %> ; !aika:ajan
      ! :Vow _ %> :Vow ; ! For i between vowels in suffix – paksu:paksujen
 
"i2:j"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
i2:j <=> :Vow (Dummy:+) (%>) _ :Vow ;

"i8:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
i8:0 <=> :Vow Cns:+ [:o|u|y] %> _ [.#.|%>] ; !added u for tuntua>tuntu, y for kääntyä>käänty

!!€ sano>i3
!!€ sano>0

!!€ alka>i3
!!€ alko>0

!!€ juo>i3
!!€ j0o>i

!! **Tests:**

!!€ sana>i2^A
!!€ sano>ja

"i:e"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
i:e <=> Cns _ %> i2: ;

!!€ tukki>i2^A
!!€ tukke>ja


!! ###  o rules

"o:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
o:0 <=> _ [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] ;  ! deletion before metathesis h
        o  _    %> [i2:|i3:|i4:|i5:] ; !shortening before i

!! **Tests:**

!!€ poro^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ por00>hoon

!! ###  ö rules
"ö:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
!ö:0 <=> [Cns|.#.|#] Vow (Cns) Cns: _ [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] ; !  deletion before metathesis h
ö:0 <=>  _ [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] ; !  deletion before metathesis h
        ö _ %> [i2:|i3:|i4:|i5:] ; !shortening before i


!! **Tests:**

!!€ hölmö^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ hölm00>höön


!! ###  u rules

"u:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
u:0 <=> [Cns|.#.|#] Vow (Cns) Cns _ %^HMETA: ;           ! before metathesis h
        [Cns|.#.|#]               _ [o|u] %> [i2:|i3:|i4:|i5:] ; ! tuoda : toi, luu : luissa
                                  _ [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] ; !kruunu, kruuhnuun
 !       u  _    %> [i2:|i3:|i4:|i5:] ; !shortening before i

!! **Tests:**

!!€ tuo>i3n
!!€ t0o>in



!! ###  y rules

"y:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
y:0 <=> [Cns|.#.|#] Vow (Cns) Cns _ %^HMETA: ;         ! deletion before h-metathesis
        _ [y|ö]  (%^WG:) %> [i2:|i3:|i4:|i|i5:] ; ! x syy, myydä, syödä,
                                  _ [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ syy>i2ss^A
!!€ s0y>issä





!! ### Vowel copying rules

!! These are the rules connected to the Meänkieli *-h-* suffixes. 
!! The vowel must be copied from the stem to the right of the *h*
!! and also deleted in the stem (cf. *talo : talhoon*)

"a copying for h metathesis"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
%^V:a <=>                   a: [%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:] %> h:     _ [:a|i] ; ! sauhnaan
                            a: [%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:] %> h:  :a _      ; ! sauhnaan
UnRndVow (Vow) (:h) Cns:+ a: [%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:] %> h: _ [:a|i] ; ! was: :i  **conflict**
                                                a  %> (h)    _ [n|t|s|l|%>|%^N:|.#.] ; !noutta

!! **Tests:**

!!€ hinta^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ hint00>haan

!!€ maa>h^Vn
!!€ maa>han


"o copying for h metathesis"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
%^V:o <=>                                                o: [%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:] %> (h:)    _ [:i|:o] ;
                                                         o: [%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:] %> (h:) :o _  ;
                                                         o                      %> (h)   _ [n|t|s|l|%>|.#.] ;
[.#.|#|Cns] [a|e|i] (Vow:) (:h) Cns:*                    a: [%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:] %>  (h:)   _ i2: ; !saunhoin/saunhoin 
[.#.|#] (Cns:*) Vow:+ Cns:+ Cns:+ Vow:+ Cns: Cns: (Cns:) a: [%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:] %> (h:)  _ i2: ; !Pl+Ill för >2-syll-nouns: a>o efter två Cns (almunakka>almunakhoin) **conflict**
[.#.|#] (Cns:*) Vow:+ Cns:+ Cns:+ Vow:+ [l|n|r] a: [%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:] %> (h:)  _ i2: ; !Pl+Ill för >2-syll-nouns: a>o efter lnr (ikkuna) **conflict**

!! **Tests:**

!!€ talo^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ tal00>hoon

! *** Warning: Unresolved <= conflict with respect to '^V:a' vs. '^V:o'
!     between "a copying for h metathesis"
!         and "o copying for h metathesis"
! 
!  **** Conflicting pair(s) of contexts: 
!   UnRndVow (Vow) (:h) Cns:+ a: [^HMETA: | ^HMET2:] > h: _ :a | i ;
!   [.#. | #] (Cns:*) Vow:+ Cns:+ Cns:+ Vow:+ Cns: Cns: (Cns:) a: [^HMETA: | ^HMET2:] > (h:) _ :i | i2: ;
! Left context example:     o b b o a o b b a:0 ^HMETA:0 > h
! Right context example:    i

"i copying for h metathesis"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
%^V:i <=> i: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> (h:)    _ :i ;
          i: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> (h:) :i _    ;
         :i           %> (h)   _ [n|t|s|l|%>|.#.] ;
         [.#.|#] Cns:* RndVow+ Cns: (Cns:) (:Cns) a: (%^WG:|%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:)  %> (h:) _ [i2:] ;  !muna>munhiin Pl+Ill h: _ [i2:] ;
         [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow+ Cns:+ (:Cns) (Cns) ä: (%^WG:|%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:)  %> (h:) _ [i2:] ;  !silmä>silmhiin Pl+Ill
         !a:0 ([%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:]) %> (h:) _ [i9:i |i2:i ]; !after adjektiv or noun plural-i !5/2
         a:0 ([%^HMETA:|%^HMET2:]) %> (h:) _ i9:i ; !after adjektiv plural-i !Testar att ta bort ovanstående för att få tillbaka seuhroin etc

!! **Tests:**

!!€ silli^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ sill00>hiin


"ä copying for h metathesis"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
%^V:ä <=> ä: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> (h:)    _ [:ä|i] ; 
          ä: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> (h:) :ä _    ;
          ä           %> (h)   _ [n|t|s|l|%>|.#.] ;
          
"e copying for h metathesis"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
%^V:e <=> e: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> (h:)    _ [:e|:i] ;
          e: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] %> (h:) :e _    ;
          e         %>  (h)     _ [n|t|s|l|%>|.#.] ;

!!€ puole^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ puol00>heen
